Massachusetts, session 194th, S492.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 72 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting, at the end thereof, the following:-
Notwithstanding any other general or special law, the department shall promulgate
regulations to promote the dignity of residents, both permanent and temporary, of nursing homes
licensed by said department that are equivalent to the protection of rights of residents of facilities
licensed by the department of mental health and the department of developmental disabilities that
shall be effective not later than July 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Chapter 70E of chapter 111 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the sentence which reads: “Any person
whose rights under this section are violated may bring, in addition to any other action allowed by
law or regulation, a civil action under sections sixty B to sixty E, inclusive, of chapter two
hundred and thirty-one,” the following additional paragraphs:-
of 2

Every nursing home shall establish a Human Rights Committee which shall have the
authority to receive and investigate, or investigate on its own motion, any complaints affecting
the rights of residents. The department shall promulgate regulations regarding the composition,
terms, and duties of said committee, and shall provide annual training for human rights
committee members in its six regions.
The Commissioner shall designate not less than two employees per region who shall be
trained in enforcement and resolution of violations of the human rights of nursing home residents
and staff. Said Human Rights Officers shall work with nursing homer human rights committees
to provide assistance and support in processing resident complaints.
SECTION 3. Chapter 70E of chapter 111 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof, “Rights of Residents shall
include the enumerated rights of nursing home residents, as appearing in the Omnibus Budget
Reform Act of 1987, guaranteed to residents receiving Medicare or Medicaid, and which shall
apply for all residents whether the resident receives Medicare or MassHealth benefits."
of 2